Idaho statutes. Title 37 FOOD, DRUGS, AND OIL
Chapter 27
UNIFORM CONTROLLED SUBSTANCES

Article I

Sec.

Article II

Article III

Article IV

Article V

Article VI

Idaho Code Art. I

Article I

§ 37-2701. Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Administer” means the direct application of a controlled substance whether by injection, inhalation, ingestion, or any other means, to the body of a patient or research subject by:

A practitioner or, in his presence, by his authorized agent; or

The patient or research subject at the direction and in the presence of the practitioner.

Isomerization devices used, intended for use, or designed for use in increasing the potency of any species of plant which is a controlled substance;

Testing equipment used, intended for use, or designed for use in identifying, or in analyzing the strength, effectiveness or purity of controlled substances;

Scales and balances used, intended for use, or designed for use in weighing or measuring controlled substances;

Diluents and adulterants, such as quinine hydrochloride, mannitol, mannite, dextrose and lactose, used, intended for use, or designed for use in cutting controlled substances;

Separation gins and sifters used, intended for use, or designed for use in removing twigs and seeds from, or in otherwise cleaning or refining, marijuana;

Blenders, bowls, containers, spoons and mixing devices used, intended for use, or designed for use in compounding controlled substances;

Capsules, balloons, envelopes and other containers used, intended for use, or designed for use in packaging small quantities of controlled substances;

Containers and other objects used, intended for use, or designed for use in storing or concealing controlled substances;

Hypodermic syringes, needles and other objects used, intended for use, or designed for use in parenterally injecting controlled substances into the human body;

Objects used, intended for use, or designed for use in ingesting, inhaling, or otherwise introducing marijuana, cocaine, hashish, or hashish oil into the human body, such as:

“Agent” means an authorized person who acts on behalf of or at the direction of a manufacturer, distributor or dispenser. It does not include a common or contract carrier, public warehouseman or employee of the carrier or warehouseman.

“Board” means the state board of pharmacy created in chapter 17, title 54, Idaho Code, or its successor agency.

“Bureau” means the drug enforcement administration, United States department of justice, or its successor agency.

“Controlled substance” means a drug, substance or immediate precursor in schedules I through VI of article II of this chapter.

“Counterfeit substance” means a controlled substance which, or the container or labeling of which, without authorization, bears the trademark, trade name, or other identifying mark, imprint, number or device, or any likeness thereof, of a manufacturer, distributor or dispenser other than the person who in fact manufactured, distributed or dispensed the substance.

“Deliver” or “delivery” means the actual, constructive, or attempted transfer from one (1) person to another of a controlled substance, whether or not there is an agency relationship.

“Director” means the director of the Idaho state police.

“Dispense” means to deliver a controlled substance to an ultimate user or research subject by or pursuant to the lawful order of a practitioner, including the packaging, labeling, or compounding necessary to prepare the substance for that delivery.

“Dispenser” means a practitioner who dispenses.

“Distribute” means to deliver other than by administering or dispensing a controlled substance.

“Distributor” means a person who distributes.

“Drug” means (1) substances recognized as drugs in the official United States Pharmacopoeia, official Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United States, or official National Formulary, or any supplement to any of them; (2) substances intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment or prevention of disease in man or animals; (3) substances, other than food, intended to affect the structure or any function of the body of man or animals; and (4) substances intended for use as a component of any article specified in clause (1), (2), or (3) of this subsection. It does not include devices or their components, parts, or accessories.

“Drug paraphernalia” means all equipment, products and materials of any kind which are used, intended for use, or designed for use, in planting, propagating, cultivating, growing, harvesting, manufacturing, compounding, converting, producing, processing, preparing, testing, analyzing, packaging, repackaging, storing, containing, concealing, injecting, ingesting, inhaling, or otherwise introducing into the human body a controlled substance in violation of this chapter. It includes, but is not limited to:
(1) Kits used, intended for use, or designed for use in planting, propagating, cultivating, growing or harvesting of any species of plant which is a controlled substance or from which a controlled substance can be derived;

Metal, wooden, acrylic, glass, stone, plastic, or ceramic pipes with or without screens, permanent screens, hashish heads, or punctured metal bowls;

Water pipes;

Carburetion tubes and devices;

Smoking and carburetion masks;

Roach clips: meaning objects used to hold burning material, such as a marijuana cigarette, that has become too small or too short to be held in the hand;

Miniature cocaine spoons, and cocaine vials;

Chamber pipes;

Carburetor pipes;

Electric pipes;

Air-driven pipes;

Chillums;

Bongs;

Ice pipes or chillers;

“Opiate” means any substance having an addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining liability similar to morphine or being capable of conversion into a drug having addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining liability. It does not include, unless specifically designated as controlled under section 37-2702, Idaho Code, the dextrorotatory isomer of 3-methoxy-n-methylmorphinan and its salts (dextromethorphan). It does include its racemic and levorotatory forms.

“Peace officer” means any duly appointed officer or agent of a law enforcement agency, as defined herein, including, but not limited to, a duly appointed investigator or agent of the Idaho state police, an officer or employee of the board of pharmacy, who is authorized by the board to enforce this chapter, an officer of the Idaho state police, a sheriff or deputy sheriff of a county, or a marshal or policeman of any city.

“Financial institution” means any bank, trust company, savings and loan association, savings bank, mutual savings bank, credit union, or loan company under the jurisdiction of the state or under the jurisdiction of an agency of the United States.

“Immediate precursor” means a substance which the board has found to be and by rule designates as being the principal compound commonly used or produced primarily for use, and which is an immediate chemical intermediary used or likely to be used in the manufacture of a controlled substance, the control of which is necessary to prevent, curtail or limit manufacture.

“Isomer” means the optical isomer, except as used in section 37-2705(d), Idaho Code.

“Law enforcement agency” means a governmental unit of one (1) or more persons employed full-time or part-time by the state or a political subdivision of the state for the purpose of preventing and detecting crime and enforcing state laws or local ordinances, employees of which unit are authorized to make arrests for crimes while acting within the scope of their authority.

“Manufacture” means the production, preparation, propagation, compounding, conversion or processing of a controlled substance, and includes extraction, directly or indirectly, from substances of natural origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis, and includes any packaging or repackaging of the substance or labeling or relabeling of its container, except that this term does not include the preparation or compounding of a controlled substance:

By a practitioner as an incident to his administering, dispensing or, as authorized by board rule, distributing of a controlled substance in the course of his professional practice; or

By a practitioner, or by his authorized agent under his supervision, for the purpose of, or as an incident to, research, teaching, or chemical analysis and not for delivery.

“Marijuana” means all parts of the plant of the genus Cannabis, regardless of species, and whether growing or not; the seeds thereof; the resin extracted from any part of such plant; and every compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of such plant, its seeds or resin. It does not include the mature stalks of the plant unless the same are intermixed with prohibited parts thereof, fiber produced from the stalks, oil or cake made from the seeds or the achene of such plant, any other compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of the mature stalks, except the resin extracted therefrom or where the same are intermixed with prohibited parts of such plant, fiber, oil, or cake, or the sterilized seed of such plant which is incapable of germination. Evidence that any plant material or the resin or any derivative thereof, regardless of form, contains any of the chemical substances classified as tetrahydrocannabinols shall create a presumption that such material is “marijuana” as defined and prohibited herein.
(u) “Narcotic drug” means any of the following, whether produced directly or indirectly by extraction from substances of vegetable origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis:

Opium and opiate, and any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation of opium or opiate.

Any salt, compound, isomer, derivative, or preparation thereof which is chemically equivalent or identical with any of the substances referred to in clause 1, but not including the isoquinoline alkaloids of opium.

Opium poppy and poppy straw.

Coca leaves and any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation of coca leaves, and any salt, compound, isomer, derivative, or preparation thereof which is chemically equivalent or identical with any of these substances, but not including decocainized coca leaves or extractions of coca leaves which do not contain cocaine or ecgonine.

“Practitioner” means:

“Prescriber” means an individual currently licensed, registered or otherwise authorized to prescribe and administer controlled substances in the course of professional practice.

“Production” includes the manufacture, planting, cultivation, growing, or harvesting of a controlled substance.

“Simulated controlled substance” means a substance that is not a controlled substance, but which by appearance or representation would lead a reasonable person to believe that the substance is a controlled substance. Appearance includes, but is not limited to, color, shape, size, and markings of the dosage unit. Representation includes, but is not limited to, representations or factors of the following nature:

“State,” when applied to a part of the United States, includes any state, district, commonwealth, territory, insular possession thereof, and any area subject to the legal authority of the United States of America.

“Ultimate user” means a person who lawfully possesses a controlled substance for his own use or for the use of a member of his household or for administering to an animal owned by him or by a member of his household.

“Utility” means any person, association, partnership or corporation providing telephone and/or communication services, electricity, natural gas or water to the public.

(2) Kits used, intended for use, or designed for use in manufacturing, compounding, converting, producing, processing or preparing controlled substances;

In determining whether an object is drug paraphernalia, a court or other authority should consider, in addition to all other logically relevant factors, the following:
1. Statements by an owner or by anyone in control of the object concerning its use;

2. Prior convictions, if any, of an owner, or of anyone in control of the object, under any state or federal law relating to any controlled substance;

3. The proximity of the object, in time and space, to a direct violation of this chapter;

4. The proximity of the object to controlled substances;

5. The existence of any residue of controlled substances on the object;

6. Direct or circumstantial evidence of the intent of an owner, or of anyone in control of the object, to deliver it to persons whom he knows, or should reasonably know, intend to use the object to facilitate a violation of this chapter; the innocence of an owner, or of anyone in control of the object, as to a direct violation of this chapter shall not prevent a finding that the object is intended for use, or designed for use as drug paraphernalia;

7. Instructions, oral or written, provided with the object concerning its use;

8. Descriptive materials accompanying the object which explain or depict its use;

9. National and local advertising concerning its use;

10. The manner in which the object is displayed for sale;

11. Whether the owner, or anyone in control of the object, is a legitimate supplier of like or related items to the community, such as a licensed distributor or dealer of tobacco products;

12. Direct or circumstantial evidence of the ratio of sales of the object(s) to the total sales of the business enterprise;

13. The existence and scope of legitimate uses for the object in the community;

14. Expert testimony concerning its use.

(w) “Opium poppy” means the plant of the species Papaver somniferum L., except its seeds.

(y) “Person” means individual, corporation, government, or governmental subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, trust, partnership or association, or any other legal entity.

(z) “Poppy straw” means all parts, except the seeds, of the opium poppy, after mowing.

(1) A physician, dentist, veterinarian, scientific investigator, or other person licensed, registered or otherwise permitted to distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect to or to administer a controlled substance in the course of his professional practice or research in this state;

(2) A pharmacy, hospital, or other institution licensed, registered, or otherwise permitted to distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect to or to administer a controlled substance in the course of its professional practice or research in this state.
(bb) “Prescribe” means a direction or authorization permitting an ultimate user to lawfully obtain or be administered controlled substances.

(1) Statements made by an owner or by anyone else in control of the substance concerning the nature of the substance, or its use or effect;

(2) Statements made to the recipient that the substance may be resold for inordinate profit; or

(3) Whether the substance is packaged in a manner normally used for illicit controlled substances.

§ 37-2702. Authority to control.

The board shall administer the regulatory provisions of this act and may add substances to or delete or reschedule all substances enumerated in the schedules in section 37-2705, 37-2707, 37-2709, 37-2711, or 37-2713, Idaho Code, pursuant to the procedures of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code. In making a determination regarding a substance, the board shall consider the following:

The actual or relative potential for abuse;

The scientific evidence of its pharmacological effect, if known;

The state of current scientific knowledge regarding the substance;

The history and current pattern of abuse;

The scope, duration, and significance of abuse;

The risk to the public health;

The potential of the substance to produce psychic or physiological dependence liability; and

Whether the substance is an immediate precursor of a substance already controlled under this article.

After considering the factors enumerated in subsection (a) of this section, the board shall make findings with respect thereto and issue a rule controlling the substance if it finds the substance has a potential for abuse.

If the board designates a substance as an immediate precursor, substances which are precursors of the controlled precursor shall not be subject to control solely because they are precursors of the controlled precursor.

If any substance is designated, rescheduled, or deleted as a controlled substance under federal law and notice thereof is given to the board, the board shall similarly control the substance under this act by promulgating a temporary rule or proposing a statutory amendment, or both, within thirty (30) days from publication in the federal register of a final order designating a substance as a controlled substance or rescheduling or deleting a substance, unless within that thirty (30) day period, the board objects to inclusion, rescheduling, or deletion. In that case, the board shall publish the reasons for objection and afford all interested parties an opportunity to be heard. At the conclusion of the hearing, the board shall publish its decision, which shall be final unless altered by statute. Upon publication of objection to inclusion, rescheduling, or deletion under this act by the board, control under this act is stayed until the board publishes its decision.

Authority to control under this section does not extend to distilled spirits, wine, malt beverages, or tobacco.

§ 37-2703. Nomenclature.

The controlled substances listed or to be listed in the schedules in sections 37-2705, 37-2707, 37-2709, 37-2711 and 37-2713, Idaho Code, are included by whatever official, common, usual, chemical, or trade-name designated.

§ 37-2704. Schedule I tests.

The board shall place a substance in schedule I if it finds that the substance:

Has high potential for abuse; and

Has no accepted medical use in treatment in the United States or lacks accepted safety for use in treatment under medical supervision.

§ 37-2705. Schedule I.

The controlled substances listed in this section are included in schedule I.

Any of the following opiates, including their isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers, unless specifically excepted, whenever the existence of these isomers, esters, ethers and salts is possible within the specific chemical designation:

Acetyl-alpha-methylfentanyl (N-[1-(1-methyl-2-phenethyl)-4- piperidinyl]-N-phenylacetamide);

Acetylmethadol;

Acetyl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylacetamide);

Acryl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylacrylamide;

Allylprodine;

Alphacetylmethadol (except levo-alphacetylmethadol also known as levo-alpha-acetylmethadol, levomethadyl acetate or LAAM);

Alphameprodine;

Alphamethadol;

Alpha-methylfentanyl;

Alpha-methylthiofentanyl (N-[1-methyl-2-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4- piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide);

Benzethidine;

Betacetylmethadol;

Beta-hydroxyfentanyl (N-[1-(2-hydroxy-2-phenethyl)-4- piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide);

Beta-hydroxy-3-methylfentanyl (N-(1-(2-hydroxy-2-phenethyl)-3- methyl-4-piperidinyl)-N-phenylpropanamide);

Betameprodine;

Betamethadol;

Betaprodine;

Clonitazene;

Cyclopentyl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylcyclopentanecarboxamide) ;

Cyclopropyl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylcyclopropanecarboxamide) ;

Dextromoramide;

Diampromide;

Diethylthiambutene;

Difenoxin;

Dimenoxadol;

Dimepheptanol;

Dimethylthiambutene;

Dioxaphetyl butyrate;

Dipipanone;

Ethylmethylthiambutene;

Etonitazene;
(32) Etoxeridine;

Any of the following opium derivatives, their salts, isomers and salts of isomers, unless specifically excepted, whenever the existence of these salts, isomers and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:

Acetorphine;

Acetyldihydrocodeine;

Benzylmorphine;

Codeine methylbromide;

Codeine-N-Oxide;

Cyprenorphine;

Desomorphine;

Dihydromorphine;

Drotebanol;

Etorphine (except hydrochloride salt);

Heroin;

Hydromorphinol;

Methyldesorphine;

Methyldihydromorphine;

Morphine methylbromide;

Morphine methylsulfonate;

Morphine-N-Oxide;

Myrophine;

Nicocodeine;

Nicomorphine;

Normorphine;

Pholcodine;

Thebacon.

Hallucinogenic substances. Any material, compound, mixture or preparation which contains any quantity of the following hallucinogenic substances, their salts, isomers and salts of isomers, unless specifically excepted, whenever the existence of these salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation (for purposes of this paragraph only, the term “isomer” includes the optical, position and geometric isomers):
(1) Dimethoxyphenethylamine, or any compound not specifically excepted or listed in another schedule that can be formed from dimethoxyphenethylamine by replacement of one (1) or more hydrogen atoms with another atom(s), functional group(s) or substructure(s) including, but not limited to, compounds such as DOB, DOC, 2C-B, 25B-NBOMe;

b. /ut/f6 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical isomers.

c. /ut/f3/f,/f4 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and its optical isomers. (Since nomenclature of these substances is not internationally standardized, compounds of these structures, regardless of numerical designation of atomic positions are covered.)
d. [(6aR,10aR)-9-(hydroxymethyl)-6,6-dimethyl-3-(2methyloctan-2-yl)-6a,7,10,10a-tetrahydrobenzo[c]chromen-1-o1)], also known as

d. 1-(4-cyanobutyl)-N-(2-phenylpropan-2-yl)-1 H-indazole-3-carboxamide (4-cn-cumyl-BUTINACA).

e. Ethyl 2-(1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indazole-3carboxamido)-3,3-dimethylbut anoate * (5f-edmbpinaca).

f. (1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indol-3-yl)(2,2,3,3tetramethylcyclopropy l)methanone (fub-144).

g. 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-N-(2-phenylpropan-2-yl)-1H-indazole-3-carbox amide (5f-cumyl-pinaca; sgt25).

h. (1-(5-fluoropentyl)-N-(2-phenylpropan-2-yl)-1 H-pyrrolo[2.3-B]pyridine-3-carboxamide(5fcumyl-P7AICA).

i. Methyl 2-(1-(cyclohexylmethyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxamido)-3-methylbutano ate (MMB-CHMICA, AMB-CHMICA).

j. Methyl 2-(1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxamido)-3,3-dimethylbuta noate (5f-mdmbpica).

k. N-(adamantan-1-yl)-1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indazole3-carboxamide (fub-akb48; fub-apinaca).

Gamma hydroxybutyric acid (some other names include GHB; gamma-hydroxybutyrate, 4-hydroxybutyrate; 4-hyroxybutanoic acid; sodium oxybate; sodium oxybutyrate);

Flunitrazepam (also known as “R2,” “Rohypnol”);

Mecloqualone;

Methaqualone.

Alpha-pyrrolidinohexanophenone* (a-php);

4-chloro-alpha-pyrrolidinovalerophenone* (4chloro-a-pvp);

Fenethylline;

Methcathinone (some other names: 2-(methyl-amino)-propiophenone, alpha-(methylamino)-propiophenone, N-methylcathinone, AL-464, AL-422, AL-463 and UR1423);

(+/-)cis-4-methylaminorex [(+/-)cis-4,5-dihydro-4-methyl-5-phenyl-2- oxazolamine];

4-methyl-alpha-ethylaminopentiophenone* (4meap);

4′-methyl-alpha-pyrrolidinohexiophenone* (mphp);

N-benzylpiperazine (also known as: BZP, 1-benzylpiperazine);

N-ethylamphetamine;

N-ethylhexedrone*;

N,N-dimethylamphetamine (also known as: N,N-alpha-trimethyl-benzeneethanamine).

(33) Fentanyl-related substances. “Fentanyl-related substances” means any substance not otherwise listed and for which no exemption or approval is in effect under section 505 of the federal food, drug, and cosmetic act, 21 U.S.C. 355, and that is structurally related to fentanyl by one (1) or more of the following modifications:

i. Replacement of the phenyl portion of the phenethyl group by any monocycle, whether or not further substituted in or on the monocycle;

ii. Substitution in or on the phenethyl group with alkyl, alkenyl, alkoxyl, hydroxyl, halo, haloalkyl, amino, or nitro groups;

iii. Substitution in or on the piperidine ring with alkyl, alkenyl, alkoxyl, ester, ether, hydroxyl, halo, haloalkyl, amino, or nitro groups;

iv. Replacement of the aniline ring with any aromatic monocycle, whether or not further substituted in or on the aromatic monocycle; and/or

v. Replacement of the N-propionyl group by another acyl group;

(34) 4-Fluoroisobutyryl fentanyl (N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)isobutyramide) ;

(35) Furanyl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylfuran-2-carboxamide);

(36) Furethidine;

(37) Hydroxypethidine;

(38) Isobutyryl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylisobutyramide);

(39) Ketobemidone;

(40) Levomoramide;

(41) Levophenacylmorphan;

(42) 3-Methylfentanyl;

(43) 3-methylthiofentanyl (N-[(3-methyl-1-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4- piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide);

(44) Morpheridine;

(45) MPPP (1-methyl-4-phenyl-4-propionoxypiperidine);

(46) MT-45 (1-cyclohexyl-4-(1,2-diphenylethyl)piperazine);

(47) Noracymethadol;

(48) Norlevorphanol;

(49) Normethadone;

(50) Norpipanone;

(51) Ocfentanil (N-(2-fluorophenyl)-2-methoxy-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl) acetamide);

(52) Para-chloroisobutyryl fentanyl (N-(4-chlorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl) isobutyramide);

(53) Para-fluorobutyryl fentanyl (N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl) butyramide);

(54) Para-fluorofentanyl (N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-[1-(2-phenethyl)-4- piperidinyl] propanamide);

(55) Para-methoxybutyryl fentanyl (N-(4-methoxyphenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl) butyramide);

(56) PEPAP (1-(-2-phenethyl)-4-phenyl-4-acetoxypiperidine);

(57) Phenadoxone;

(58) Phenampromide;
(59) Phenomorphan;

(60) Phenoperidine;

(61) Piritramide;

(62) Proheptazine;

(63) Properidine;

(64) Propiram;

(65) Racemoramide;

(66) Tetrahydrofuranyl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidine-4-yl)-N-phenyltetrahydrofuran-2-carbo xamide;

(67) Thiofentanyl (N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-piperidinyl]-

propanamide);

(68) Tilidine;

(69) Trimeperidine;

(70) u-47700 (3,4-Dichloro-N-[2-(dimethylamino)cyclohexyl]-N-methylbenzamide ;

(71) Valeryl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylpentanamide).

(2) Methoxyamphetamine or any compound not specifically excepted or listed in another schedule that can be formed from methoxyamphetamine by replacement of one (1) or more hydrogen atoms with another atom(s), functional group(s) or substructure(s) including, but not limited to, compounds such as PMA and DOM;

(3) 5-methoxy-3,4-methylenedioxy-amphetamine;

(4) 5-methoxy-N,N-diisopropyltryptamine;

(5) Amphetamine or methamphetamine with a halogen substitution on the benzyl ring, including compounds such as fluorinated amphetamine and fluorinated methamphetamine;

(6) 3,4-methylenedioxy amphetamine;

(7) 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine (MDMA);

(8) 3,4-methylenedioxy-N-ethylamphetamine (also known as N-ethyl-alpha-methyl-3,4 (methylenedioxy) phenethylamine, and N-ethyl MDA, MDE, MDEA);

(9) N-hydroxy-3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine (also known as N-hydroxy-alpha-methyl-3,4(methylenedioxy) phenethylamine, and N-hydroxy MDA);

(10) 3,4,5-trimethoxy amphetamine;

(11) 5-methoxy-N,N-dimethyltryptamine (also known as 5-methoxy-3-2[2-(dimethylamino)ethyl]indole and 5-MeO-DMT);

(12) Alpha-ethyltryptamine (some other names: etryptamine, 3-(2-aminobutyl) indole);

(13) Alpha-methyltryptamine;

(14) Bufotenine;

(15) Diethyltryptamine (DET);

(16) Dimethyltryptamine (DMT);

(17) Ibogaine;

(18) Lysergic acid diethylamide;

(19) Marihuana;

(20) Mescaline;

(21) Parahexyl;

(22) Peyote;

(23) N-ethyl-3-piperidyl benzilate;

(24) N-methyl-3-piperidyl benzilate;

(25) Psilocybin;

(26) Psilocyn;

(27) Tetrahydrocannabinols or synthetic equivalents of the substances contained in the plant, or in the resinous extractives of Cannabis, sp. and/or synthetic substances, derivatives, and their isomers with similar chemical structure such as the following:

i. Tetrahydrocannabinols:

a. /ut/f1 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical isomers, excluding dronabinol in sesame oil and encapsulated in either a soft gelatin capsule or in an oral solution in a drug product approved by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration.

6aR-trans-3-(1,1-dimethylheptyl)-6a,7,10,10a-tetrahydro-1-hydro xy- 6,6-dimethyl-6H-dibenzo[b,d]pyran-9-methanol (HU-210) and its geometric isomers (HU211 or dexanabinol).

ii. The following synthetic drugs:

a. Any compound structurally derived from (1H-indole-3-yl) (cycloalkyl, cycloalkenyl, aryl)methanone, or (1H-indole-3-yl) (cycloalkyl, cycloalkenyl, aryl)methane, or (1H-indole-3-yl) (cycloalkyl, cycloalkenyl, aryl), methyl or dimethyl butanoate, amino-methyl (or dimethyl)-1-oxobutan-2-yl) carboxamide by substitution at the nitrogen atoms of the indole ring or carboxamide to any extent, whether or not further substituted in or on the indole ring to any extent, whether or not substituted to any extent in or on the cycloalkyl, cycloalkenyl, aryl ring(s) (substitution in the ring may include, but is not limited to, heteroatoms such as nitrogen, sulfur and oxygen).

b. N-(1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1 H-indazole-3-carboxamide (5F-AB-PINACA).

c. 1-(1.3-benzodioxol-5-yl)-2-(ethylamino)-pentan-1-one (N-ethylpentylone, ephylone).

l
. Naphthalen-1-yl 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxylate (NM2201; CBL2201).

m. Any compound structurally derived from 3-(1-naphthoyl)pyrrole by substitution at the nitrogen atom of the pyrrole ring to any extent, whether or not further substituted in the pyrrole ring to any extent, whether or not substituted in the naphthyl ring to any extent.

n. Any compound structurally derived from 1-(1-naphthylmethyl)indene by substitution at the 3-position of the indene ring to any extent, whether or not further substituted in the indene ring to any extent, whether or not substituted in the naphthyl ring to any extent.

o. Any compound structurally derived from 3-phenylacetylindole by substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring to any extent, whether or not further substituted in the indole ring to any extent, whether or not substituted in the phenyl ring to any extent.

p. Any compound structurally derived from 2-(3-hydroxycyclohexyl)phenol by substitution at the 5-position of the phenolic ring to any extent, whether or not substituted in the cyclohexyl ring to any extent.
q. Any compound structurally derived from 3-(benzoyl)indole structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring to any extent, whether or not further substituted in the indole ring to any extent and whether or not substituted in the phenyl ring to any extent.

r. [2,3-dihydro-5-methyl-3-(4-morpholinylmethyl)pyrrolo[1,2,3-de]- 1,4-benzoxazin-6-yl]-1-napthalenylmethanone (WIN-55,212-2).

s. 3-dimethylheptyl-11-hydroxyhexahydrocannabinol (HU-243).

t. [(6S, 6aR, 9R, 10aR)-9-hydroxy-6-methyl-3-[(2R)-5-phenylpentan-2-yl]oxy-5,6,6a ,7,8,9,10, 10a-octahydrophenanthridin-1-yl]acetate (CP 50,5561).

(28) Ethylamine analog of phencyclidine: N-ethyl-1-phenylcyclohexylamine (1-phenylcyclohexyl) ethylamine; N-(1-phenylcyclohexyl) ethylamine, cyclohexamine, PCE;

(29) Pyrrolidine analog of phencyclidine: 1-(phenylcyclohexyl)-pyrrolidine, PCPy, PHP;

(30) Thiophene analog of phencyclidine 1-[1-(2-thienyl)-cyclohexyl]-piperidine, 2-thienylanalog of phencyclidine, TPCP, TCP;

(31) 1-[1-(2-thienyl) cyclohexyl] pyrrolidine another name: TCPy;

(32) Spores or mycelium capable of producing mushrooms that contain psilocybin or psilocin.

(e) Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances having a depressant effect on the central nervous system, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers whenever the existence of such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:

(f) Stimulants. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances having a stimulant effect on the central nervous system, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers:

(1) Aminorex (some other names: aminoxaphen, 2-amino-5-phenyl-2-oxazoline, or 4,5-dihydro-5-phenyl-2-oxazolamine);

(2) Cathinone (some other names: 2-amino-1-phenol-1-propanone, alpha-aminopropiophenone, 2-aminopropiophenone and norephedrone);

(3) Substituted cathinones. Any compound, except bupropion or compounds listed under a different schedule, structurally derived from 2-aminopropan-1-one by substitution at the 1-position with either phenyl, naphthyl or thiophene ring systems, whether or not the compound is further modified in any of the following ways:

i. By substitution in the ring system to any extent with alkyl, alkylenedioxy, alkoxy, haloalkyl, hydroxyl or halide substituents, whether or not further substituted in the ring system by one (1) or more other univalent substituents;

ii. By substitution at the 3-position with an acyclic alkyl substituent;

iii. By substitution at the 2-amino nitrogen atom with alkyl, dialkyl, benzyl or methoxybenzyl groups, or by inclusion of the 2-amino nitrogen atom in a cyclic structure.
(4 Alpha-pyrrolidinoheptaphenone* (PV8);

§ 37-2706. Schedule II tests.

The board shall place a substance in schedule II if it finds that:

The substance has high potential for abuse;

The substance has currently accepted medical use in treatment in the United States, or currently accepted medical use with severe restrictions; and

The abuse of the substance may lead to severe psychic or physical dependence.

§ 37-2707. Schedule II.

Schedule II shall consist of the drugs and other substances, by whatever official name, common or usual name, chemical name, or brand name designated, listed in this section.

Substances, vegetable origin or chemical synthesis. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any of the following substances whether produced directly or indirectly by extraction from substances of vegetable origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis:

Opium and opiate, and any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation of opium or opiate, excluding apomorphine, dextrorphan, nalbuphine, nalmefene, naloxone, naltrexone and their respective salts, but including the following:

Any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation thereof which is chemically equivalent or identical with any of the substances referred to in paragraph (b)(1) of this section, except that these substances shall not include the isoquinoline alkaloids of opium.

Opium poppy and poppy straw.

Coca leaves and any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation of coca leaves, and any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation thereof which is chemically equivalent or identical with any of these substances, but shall not include the following:

Benzoylecgonine.

Methylbenzoylecgonine (Cocaine — its salts, optical isomers, and salts of optical isomers).
(7) Concentrate of poppy straw (the crude extract of poppy straw in either liquid, solid or powder form which contains the phenanthrine alkaloids of the opium poppy).

Concentrate of poppy straw (the crude extract of poppy straw in either liquid, solid or powder form which contains the phenanthrine alkaloids of the opium poppy).

Any of the following opiates, including their isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, whenever the existence of these isomers, esters, ethers and salts is possible within the specific chemical designation, unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule:

Alfentanil;

Alphaprodine;

Anileridine;

Bezitramide;

Bulk Dextropropoxyphene (nondosage forms);

Carfentanil;

Dihydrocodeine;

Diphenoxylate;

Fentanyl;

Isomethadone;

Levo-alphacetylmethadol (also known as levo-alpha-acetylmethadol, levomethadyl acetate, LAAM);

Levomethorphan;

Levorphanol;

Metazocine;

Methadone;

Methadone — Intermediate, 4-cyano-2-dimethylamino-4, 4-diphenyl butane;

Moramide — Intermediate, 2-methyl-3-morpholino-1, 1-diphenyl propane-carboxylic acid;

Pethidine (meperidine);

Pethidine — Intermediate — A, 4-cyano-1-methyl-4-phenylpiperidine;

Pethidine — Intermediate — B, ethyl-4-phenylpiperidine-4-carboxylate;

Pethidine — Intermediate — C, 1-methyl-4-phenylpiperidine-4-carboxylic acid;

Phenazocine;

Piminodine;

Racemethorphan;

Racemorphan;

Remifentanil;

Sufentanil.

Stimulants. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances having a stimulant effect on the central nervous system:

Amphetamine, its salts, optical isomers, and salts of its optical isomers;

Lisdexamfetamine;

Methamphetamine, its salts, isomers, and salts of its isomers;

Phenmetrazine and its salts;

Methylphenidate.

Depressants. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances having a depressant effect on the central nervous system, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, whenever the existence of such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:
(1) Amobarbital;

Hallucinogenic substances.

Nabilone ................ (another name for nabilone:(+/-)-trans-3-(1,1- dimethylheptyl)-6,6a,7,8,10,10a- hexahydro-1- hydroxy-6,6-dimethyl-9H- dibenzo[b,d]pyran-9-one) (21 CFR 1308.12 (f))

Immediate precursors. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances:

Immediate precursor to amphetamine and methamphetamine:

Anthranilic acid;

Ephedrine;

Lead acetate;

Methylamine;

Methyl formamide;

N-methylephedrine;

Phenylacetic acid;

Phenylacetone;

Phenylpropanolamine;

Pseudoephedrine.

1. Decocainized coca leaves or extractions of coca leaves, which extractions do not contain cocaine; or ecgonine; or

2. [/f1/f2/f3I]ioflupane.

(2) Glutethimide;

(3) Pentobarbital;

(4) Phencyclidine;

(5) Secobarbital.

Except that any combination or compound containing ephedrine, or any of its salts and isomers, or phenylpropanolamine or its salts and isomers, or pseudoephedrine, or any of its salts and isomers which is prepared for dispensing or over-the-counter distribution is not a controlled substance for the purpose of this section, unless such substance is possessed, delivered, or possessed with intent to deliver to another with the intent to manufacture methamphetamine, amphetamine or any other controlled substance in violation of section 37-2732, Idaho Code. For purposes of this provision, the requirements of the uniform controlled substances act shall not apply to a manufacturer, wholesaler or retailer of over-the-counter products containing the listed substances unless such person possesses, delivers, or possesses with intent to deliver to another the over-the-counter product with intent to manufacture a controlled substance.

(2) Immediate precursors to phencyclidine (PCP):

(a) 1-phenylcyclohexylamine;

(b) 1-piperidinocyclohexanecarbonitrile (PCC).

(3) Immediate precursor to fentanyl: 4-anilino-N-phenethyl-4-piperidine (ANPP).

§ 37-2708. Schedule III tests.

The board shall place a substance in schedule III if it finds that:

The substance has a potential for abuse less than the substances listed in schedules I and II;

The substance has currently accepted medical use in treatment in the United States; and

Abuse of the substance may lead to moderate or low physical dependence or high psychological dependence.